Wisconsin, session 2025, SB727.
do enact as follows:SB727,11Section 1. 302.073 of the statutes is created to read:SB727,2,32302.073 State correctional institution inmate personal hygiene 3products. (1) In this section:SB727,2,64(a) “Benchmark retailer” means the retail chain in this state that has at least 5one physical store in the state and has the highest annual gross receipts of any 6retail chain in the state.SB727,2,77(b) “Sales price” has the meaning given in s. 77.51 (15b).SB727,2,108(2) The department shall ensure that each state correctional institution has a 9commissary that provides all of the following personal hygiene products for 10acquisition by inmates:SB727,2,1311(a) To be sold at all state correctional facilities for no more than 125 percent of 12the sales price of the same product at the benchmark retailer, at least 2 varieties of 13all of the following products:SB727,2,14141. Deodorant.SB727,2,15152. Antiperspirant.SB727,2,16163. Shampoo.SB727,2,17174. Hair conditioner.SB727,3,115. Liquid body wash.SB727,3,226. Bar soap.SB727,3,337. Body lotion.SB727,3,448. Face wash.SB727,3,559. Facial lotion.SB727,3,6610. Toothpaste.SB727,3,7711. Toothbrush.SB727,3,8812. Dental floss.SB727,3,9913. Razor.SB727,3,101014. Shaving cream.SB727,3,111115. Sunscreen.SB727,3,121216. Comb.SB727,3,131317. Hairbrush.SB727,3,141418. Cleansing wipes.SB727,3,1715(b) To be sold at all state correctional facilities for no more than 100 percent of 16the sales price of the same product at the benchmark retailer, at least 2 varieties of 17all of the following culturally sensitive personal hygiene products:SB727,3,18181. Hair shampoo that is appropriate for types 2, 3, and 4 hair.SB727,3,19192. Hair conditioner that is appropriate for types 2, 3, and 4 hair.SB727,3,20203. Natural hair oil that is appropriate for types 2, 3, and 4 hair.SB727,3,21214. Shaving cream that is appropriate for types 2, 3, and 4 hair.SB727,3,22225. Bar soap.SB727,3,23236. Cocoa-butter-based body lotion.SB727,4,31(3) The department shall ensure that each inmate in a state correctional 2institution is provided with a monthly personal hygiene stipend of $25 to purchase 3personal hygiene products.SB727,24Section 2. 302.074 of the statutes is created to read:SB727,4,85302.074 County jail or house of correction inmate personal hygiene 6products. (1) The sheriff shall ensure that each county jail or house of correction 7has a commissary that provides all of the following personal hygiene products for 8acquisition by inmates:SB727,4,109(a) To be sold for no more than the price set for the same product under s. 10302.073 (2) (a), at least 2 varieties of all of the following products:SB727,4,11111. Deodorant.SB727,4,12122. Antiperspirant.SB727,4,13133. Shampoo.SB727,4,14144. Hair conditioner.SB727,4,15155. Liquid body wash.SB727,4,16166. Bar soap. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb727 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb727 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB727 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB727 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB727: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting